District of Columbia statutes.
47-4601

Lincoln Square Theater sales and use tax exemption.

Beginning June 1, 2003, and ending May 31, 2008, sales of tangible personal property, not to exceed the aggregate amount of $800,000, to be incorporated into or consumed in the renovation of the Lincoln Square Theater shall be exempt from taxation under Chapter 20 and Chapter 22 of this title. For the purposes of this section, the term “Lincoln Square Theater” means an 8-screen motion picture theater consisting of approximately 1,100 seats and comprising approximately 40,000 square feet, located in square 374, lot 22, in the District of Columbia and owned and operated by Silver Cinemas Acquisition Company.

History

Apr. 5, 2005, D.C. Law 15-269, § 2(b), 52 DCR 475
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 83, 53 DCR 6794

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-191 substituted “of this title” for “of this title” following “Chapter 22”.

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see 2(b) of Lincoln Square Theater Sales and Use Tax Exemption Temporary Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-37, October 28, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 9490).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Lincoln Square Theater Sales and Use Tax Exemption Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-95, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5467).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(b) of Lincoln Square Theater Sales and use Tax Exemption Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-147, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8353).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Atlanta Coast Conference Tournament Ticket Tax Clarification Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-52, March 17, 2005, 52 DCR 3168).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 15 of Finance and Revenue Technical Amendments Second Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-585, December 28, 2006, 54 DCR 340).